Utah statutes.
10-7-30.   Failure to pay for repairs -- Lien on company's property.
In the event of the refusal of any such company to pave, repave or repair as
required herein when so directed, upon the paving or repaving of any street
upon which its track is laid, the municipality shall have power to pave,
repave or repair the same, and the cost and expense of such paving, repaving
or repairing may be collected by levy and sale of any property of such company
in the same manner as special taxes are now or may be collected. Special taxes
for the purpose of paying the cost of any such paving or repaving,
macadamizing or repairing of any such railway may be levied upon the track,
including the ties, iron, roadbed, right of way, sidetracks and appurtenances,
and buildings and real estate belonging to any such company and used for the
purpose of such railway business all as one property, or upon such parts of
such track, appurtenances and property as may be within the district paved,
repaved, macadamized or repaired, and shall be a lien upon the property levied
upon from the time of the levy until satisfied. No mortgage, conveyance,
pledge, transfer or encumbrance of any such property or of any rolling stock
or personal property of any such company, created or suffered by it after the
time when any street or part thereof upon which any railway shall have been
laid shall have been ordered paved, repaved, macadamized or repaired shall be
made or suffered except subject to the lien of such special taxes, if such
levy is in contemplation.
